Utah statutes.
16-11-14.   Annual certificate -- Filing -- Contents -- Filing fee.

During the month of the anniversary date of incorporation, each professional corporation shall file with the division an annual report as specified by Section 16-10a-1607, giving the names and residence addresses of all shareholders of the professional corporation as of its anniversary date of incorporation next preceding, and certifying that all of the shareholders are duly licensed to render the same specific professional services as those for which the corporation was organized or otherwise qualify to be shareholders pursuant to the applicable licensing act for the profession for which the corporation was organized.

